New York, session 2025-2026, A550.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 9 of section 375 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 576 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 9. a. Every omnibus operating upon the public highways of the state 5 having a carrying capacity of ten or more passengers, shall be equipped 6 with one hand fire extinguisher of at least 4 B:C Underwriters' Labora- 7 tories rating or a similar rating by any qualified laboratory or testing 8 organization which meets the criteria of American Society for Testing 9 Materials test E548-76. Fire extinguishers shall be kept in good operat- 10 ing condition at all times and must be mounted in a place readily acces- 11 sible for use. 12 b. Every for-hire vehicle operated or driven upon the public highways 13 of the state with a chassis which was manufactured and then altered for 14 the purpose of transporting ten or more occupants, including the driver, 15 shall be equipped with an operable carbon monoxide detector. The commis- 16 sioner, in consultation with the commissioner of transportation, shall 17 promulgate rules and regulations as such commissioner shall deem neces- 18 sary to carry out the provisions of this paragraph. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02607-01-5